src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/ast/hunspell/ast_ES.aff
FLAG long
SFX Vf Y 1165
SFX Vf ebrar iebro/G0 ebrar
SFX Vf ebrar iebro'l/G0 ebrar
SFX Vf ebrar iébro/XxV3V4 ebrar
SFX Vf ebrar iebres/G0 ebrar
SFX Vf ebrar iebras/G0 ebrar
SFX Vf ebrar iébres/XxV7V8 ebrar
SFX Vf ebrar iébras/XxV7V8 ebrar
SFX Vf ebrar iebre/G1 ebrar
SFX Vf ebrar iebre'l/G1 ebrar
SFX Vf ebrar iébre/XxV1V2V3V4 ebrar
SFX Vf ebrar iebren/G1 ebrar
SFX Vf ebrar iebran/G1 ebrar
SFX Vf ebrar iébren/XxV1V2 ebrar
SFX Vf ebrar iébran/XxV1V2 ebrar
SFX Vf ecar ieco/G0 ecar
SFX Vf ecar ieco'l/G0 ecar
SFX Vf ecar iéco/XxV3V4 ecar
SFX Vf ecar ieques/G0 ecar
SFX Vf ecar iecas/G0 ecar
SFX Vf ecar ques/XxV7V8 ecar
SFX Vf ecar iécas/XxV7V8 ecar
SFX Vf ecar ieque/G1 ecar
SFX Vf ecar ieque'l/G1 ecar
SFX Vf ecar que/XxV1V2V3V4 ecar
SFX Vf ecar iequen/G1 ecar
SFX Vf ecar iecan/G1 ecar
SFX Vf ecar quen/XxV1V2 ecar
SFX Vf ecar iécan/XxV1V2 ecar
SFX Vf edar iedo/G0 edar
SFX Vf edar iedo'l/G0 edar
SFX Vf edar iédo/XxV3V4 edar
SFX Vf edar iedes/G0 edar
SFX Vf edar iedas/G0 edar
SFX Vf edar iédes/XxV7V8 edar
SFX Vf edar iédas/XxV7V8 edar
SFX Vf edar iede/G1 edar
SFX Vf edar iede'l/G1 edar
SFX Vf edar iéde/XxV1V2V3V4 edar
SFX Vf edar ieden/G1 edar
SFX Vf edar iedan/G1 edar
SFX Vf edar iéden/XxV1V2 edar
SFX Vf edar iédan/XxV1V2 edar
SFX Vf edrar iedro/G0 edrar
SFX Vf edrar iedro'l/G0 edrar
SFX Vf edrar iédro/XxV3V4 edrar
SFX Vf edrar iedres/G0 edrar
SFX Vf edrar iedras/G0 edrar
SFX Vf edrar iédres/XxV7V8 edrar
SFX Vf edrar iédras/XxV7V8 edrar
SFX Vf edrar iedre/G1 edrar
SFX Vf edrar iedre'l/G1 edrar
SFX Vf edrar iédre/XxV1V2V3V4 edrar
SFX Vf edrar iedren/G1 edrar
SFX Vf edrar iedran/G1 edrar
SFX Vf edrar iédren/XxV1V2 edrar
SFX Vf edrar iédran/XxV1V2 edrar
SFX Vf egar iego/G0 egar
SFX Vf egar iego'l/G0 egar
SFX Vf egar iégo/XxV3V4 egar
SFX Vf egar iegues/G0 egar
SFX Vf egar iegas/G0 egar
SFX Vf egar gues/XxV7V8 egar
SFX Vf egar iégas/XxV7V8 egar
SFX Vf egar iegue/G1 egar
SFX Vf egar iegue'l/G1 egar
SFX Vf egar gue/XxV1V2V3V4 egar
SFX Vf egar ieguen/G1 egar
SFX Vf egar iegan/G1 egar
SFX Vf egar guen/XxV1V2 egar
SFX Vf egar iégan/XxV1V2 egar
SFX Vf eldar ieldo/G0 eldar
SFX Vf eldar ieldo'l/G0 eldar
SFX Vf eldar iéldo/XxV3V4 eldar
SFX Vf eldar ieldes/G0 eldar
SFX Vf eldar ieldas/G0 eldar
SFX Vf eldar iéldes/XxV7V8 eldar
SFX Vf eldar iéldas/XxV7V8 eldar
SFX Vf eldar ielde/G1 eldar
SFX Vf eldar ielde'l/G1 eldar
SFX Vf eldar iélde/XxV1V2V3V4 eldar
SFX Vf eldar ielden/G1 eldar
SFX Vf eldar ieldan/G1 eldar
SFX Vf eldar iélden/XxV1V2 eldar
SFX Vf eldar iéldan/XxV1V2 eldar
SFX Vf elgar ielgo/G0 elgar
SFX Vf elgar ielgo'l/G0 elgar
SFX Vf elgar iélgo/XxV3V4 elgar
SFX Vf elgar ielgues/G0 elgar
SFX Vf elgar ielgas/G0 elgar
SFX Vf elgar gues/XxV7V8 elgar
SFX Vf elgar iélgas/XxV7V8 elgar
SFX Vf elgar ielgue/G1 elgar
SFX Vf elgar ielgue'l/G1 elgar
SFX Vf elgar gue/XxV1V2V3V4 elgar
SFX Vf elgar ielguen/G1 elgar
SFX Vf elgar ielgan/G1 elgar
SFX Vf elgar guen/XxV1V2 elgar
SFX Vf elgar iélgan/XxV1V2 elgar
SFX Vf ellar iello/G0 ellar
SFX Vf ellar iello'l/G0 ellar
SFX Vf ellar iéllo/XxV3V4 ellar
SFX Vf ellar ielles/G0 ellar
SFX Vf ellar iellas/G0 ellar
SFX Vf ellar iélles/XxV7V8 ellar
SFX Vf ellar iéllas/XxV7V8 ellar
SFX Vf ellar ielle/G1 ellar
SFX Vf ellar ielle'l/G1 ellar
SFX Vf ellar iélle/XxV1V2V3V4 ellar
SFX Vf ellar iellen/G1 ellar
SFX Vf ellar iellan/G1 ellar
SFX Vf ellar iéllen/XxV1V2 ellar
SFX Vf ellar iéllan/XxV1V2 ellar
SFX Vf emblar iemblo/G0 emblar
SFX Vf emblar iemblo'l/G0 emblar
SFX Vf emblar iémblo/XxV3V4 emblar
SFX Vf emblar iembles/G0 emblar
SFX Vf emblar iemblas/G0 emblar
SFX Vf emblar iémbles/XxV7V8 emblar
SFX Vf emblar iémblas/XxV7V8 emblar
SFX Vf emblar iemble/G1 emblar
SFX Vf emblar iemble'l/G1 emblar
SFX Vf emblar iémble/XxV1V2V3V4 emblar
SFX Vf emblar iemblen/G1 emblar
SFX Vf emblar iemblan/G1 emblar
SFX Vf emblar iémblen/XxV1V2 emblar
SFX Vf emblar iémblan/XxV1V2 emblar
SFX Vf embrar iembro/G0 embrar
SFX Vf embrar iembro'l/G0 embrar
SFX Vf embrar iémbro/XxV3V4 embrar
SFX Vf embrar iembres/G0 embrar
SFX Vf embrar iembras/G0 embrar
SFX Vf embrar iémbres/XxV7V8 embrar
SFX Vf embrar iémbras/XxV7V8 embrar
SFX Vf embrar iembre/G1 embrar
SFX Vf embrar iembre'l/G1 embrar
SFX Vf embrar iémbre/XxV1V2V3V4 embrar
SFX Vf embrar iembren/G1 embrar
SFX Vf embrar iembran/G1 embrar
SFX Vf embrar iémbren/XxV1V2 embrar
SFX Vf embrar iémbran/XxV1V2 embrar
SFX Vf endar iendo/G0 endar
SFX Vf endar iendo'l/G0 endar
SFX Vf endar iéndo/XxV3V4 endar
SFX Vf endar iendes/G0 endar
SFX Vf endar iendas/G0 endar
SFX Vf endar iéndes/XxV7V8 endar
SFX Vf endar iéndas/XxV7V8 endar
SFX Vf endar iende/G1 endar
SFX Vf endar iende'l/G1 endar
SFX Vf endar iénde/XxV1V2V3V4 endar
SFX Vf endar ienden/G1 endar
SFX Vf endar iendan/G1 endar
SFX Vf endar iénden/XxV1V2 endar
SFX Vf endar iéndan/XxV1V2 endar
SFX Vf engar iengo/G0 engar
SFX Vf engar iengo'l/G0 engar
SFX Vf engar iéngo/XxV3V4 engar
SFX Vf engar iengues/G0 engar
SFX Vf engar iengas/G0 engar
SFX Vf engar gues/XxV7V8 engar
SFX Vf engar iéngas/XxV7V8 engar
SFX Vf engar iengue/G1 engar
SFX Vf engar iengue'l/G1 engar
SFX Vf engar gue/XxV1V2V3V4 engar
SFX Vf engar ienguen/G1 engar
SFX Vf engar iengan/G1 engar
SFX Vf engar guen/XxV1V2 engar
SFX Vf engar iéngan/XxV1V2 engar
SFX Vf entar iento/G0 entar
SFX Vf entar iento'l/G0 entar
SFX Vf entar iénto/XxV3V4 entar
SFX Vf entar ientes/G0 entar
SFX Vf entar ientas/G0 entar
SFX Vf entar iéntes/XxV7V8 entar
SFX Vf entar iéntas/XxV7V8 entar
SFX Vf entar iente/G1 entar
SFX Vf entar iente'l/G1 entar
SFX Vf entar iénte/XxV1V2V3V4 entar
SFX Vf entar ienten/G1 entar
SFX Vf entar ientan/G1 entar
SFX Vf entar iénten/XxV1V2 entar
SFX Vf entar iéntan/XxV1V2 entar
SFX Vf enzar ienzo/G0 enzar
SFX Vf enzar ienzo'l/G0 enzar
SFX Vf enzar iénzo/XxV3V4 enzar
SFX Vf enzar iences/G0 enzar
SFX Vf enzar ienzas/G0 enzar
SFX Vf enzar ces/XxV7V8 enzar
SFX Vf enzar iénzas/XxV7V8 enzar
SFX Vf enzar ience/G1 enzar
SFX Vf enzar ience'l/G1 enzar
SFX Vf enzar ce/XxV1V2V3V4 enzar
SFX Vf enzar iencen/G1 enzar
SFX Vf enzar ienzan/G1 enzar
SFX Vf enzar cen/XxV1V2 enzar
SFX Vf enzar iénzan/XxV1V2 enzar
SFX Vf ernar ierno/G0 ernar
SFX Vf ernar ierno'l/G0 ernar
SFX Vf ernar iérno/XxV3V4V3V4 ernar
SFX Vf ernar ierna/ ernar
SFX Vf ernar iérna/XxV1V2V3V4 ernar
SFX Vf ernar iernas/G0 ernar
SFX Vf ernar iérnas/XxV7V8 ernar
SFX Vf ernar iernan/G1 ernar
SFX Vf ernar iérnan/XxV1V2 ernar
SFX Vf errar ierro/G0 errar
SFX Vf errar ierro'l/G0 errar
SFX Vf errar iérro/XxV3V4 errar
SFX Vf errar ierres/G0 errar
SFX Vf errar ierras/G0 errar
SFX Vf errar iérres/XxV7V8 errar
SFX Vf errar iérras/XxV7V8 errar
SFX Vf errar ierre/G1 errar
SFX Vf errar ierre'l/G1 errar
SFX Vf errar iérre/XxV1V2V3V4 errar
SFX Vf errar ierren/G1 errar
SFX Vf errar ierran/G1 errar
SFX Vf errar iérren/XxV1V2 errar
SFX Vf errar iérran/XxV1V2 errar
SFX Vf ertar ierto/G0 ertar
SFX Vf ertar ierto'l/G0 ertar
SFX Vf ertar iérto/XxV3V4 ertar
SFX Vf ertar iertes/G0 ertar
SFX Vf ertar iertas/G0 ertar
SFX Vf ertar iértes/XxV7V8 ertar
SFX Vf ertar iértas/XxV7V8 ertar
SFX Vf ertar ierte/G1 ertar
SFX Vf ertar ierte'l/G1 ertar
SFX Vf ertar iérte/XxV1V2V3V4 ertar
SFX Vf ertar ierten/G1 ertar
SFX Vf ertar iertan/G1 ertar
SFX Vf ertar iérten/XxV1V2 ertar
SFX Vf ertar iértan/XxV1V2 ertar
SFX Vf esar ieso/G0 esar
SFX Vf esar ieso'l/G0 esar
SFX Vf esar iéso/XxV3V4 esar
SFX Vf esar ieses/G0 esar
SFX Vf esar iesas/G0 esar
SFX Vf esar iéses/XxV7V8 esar
SFX Vf esar iésas/XxV7V8 esar
SFX Vf esar iese/G1 esar
SFX Vf esar iese'l/G1 esar
SFX Vf esar iése/XxV1V2V3V4 esar
SFX Vf esar iesen/G1 esar
SFX Vf esar iesan/G1 esar
SFX Vf esar iésen/XxV1V2 esar
SFX Vf esar iésan/XxV1V2 esar
SFX Vf escar iesco/G0 escar
SFX Vf escar iesco'l/G0 escar
SFX Vf escar iésco/XxV3V4 escar
SFX Vf escar iesques/G0 escar
SFX Vf escar iescas/G0 escar
SFX Vf escar ques/XxV7V8 escar
SFX Vf escar iéscas/XxV7V8 escar
SFX Vf escar iesque/G1 escar
SFX Vf escar iesque'l/G1 escar
SFX Vf escar que/XxV1V2V3V4 escar
SFX Vf escar iesquen/G1 escar
SFX Vf escar iescan/G1 escar
SFX Vf escar quen/XxV1V2 escar
SFX Vf escar iéscan/XxV1V2 escar
