src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/ast/hunspell/ast_ES.dic
absolver/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
acarrellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
acertar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
acopellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
acorrer/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
acoyer/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
adentellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
adquirir/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
afebrar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
aforar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
afoyar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
agostar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
alcontrar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
alendar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
alpenzar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
altravesar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
amacellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
amarellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
amestar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
amorcellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
amormellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
anochar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
antecoyer/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
anzolar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
apegar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
apertar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
aportellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
apostar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
aprobar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
arrastrellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
arremelgar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
arrepentir/VtVbVfViVjVkVmVrVt
arreventar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
arrobellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
arropellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
asentar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
asosegar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
atender/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
atorcar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
atronar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
avergonzar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
azogar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
azurdellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
calentar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
capellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
cascubellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
ceder/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
cernir/VtVbVfViVjVkVmVrVt
colgar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
comenzar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
comprobar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
confesar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
consentir/VtVbVfViVjVkVnVrVt
contar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
correr/VtSmYsVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
corromper/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
costar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
cuadrellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
demostrar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
derromper/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
desamestar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
desamorgar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
desaprobar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
desasosegar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
descamellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
desconcertar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
descontar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
descoser/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
desempoyar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
desencoyer/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
desengavellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
desenllamorgar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
desenrestrar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
desenterrar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
desenvolver/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
desferrar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
desgobernar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
desmentir/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
despertar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
desplegar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
desprender/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
desterrar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
destravesar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
desvolver/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
dexoncer/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
disonar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
doler/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
dunviar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
empoder/VtVbVfVhVkVrVt
emprecontar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
encibellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
encomenzar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
encuadrellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
enfolgar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
engodobellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
enllamorgar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
enrestrar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
ensellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
entestar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
entrever/VtVbVfVjVkVmVr
escalentar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
escartafoyar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
escolgar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
escomenzar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
escornar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
escoyer/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
esgarfellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
esmelgar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
esmoler/VtVbVfVhVkVmVr
esmorcellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
esperder/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
esregar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
fender/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
folgar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
garfellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
goyar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
inxerir/VtVbVfViVjVkVmVrVt
llover/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
marmoler/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
moler/VtVbVfVhVkVmVr
mover/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
ofender/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
perder/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
poblar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
prender/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
probar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
rancollar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
recocer/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
recoser/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
refertar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
reforzar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
remover/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
repoblar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
rescocer/VtSmYsVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
resolver/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
restorcer/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
reventar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
rodabellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
rosollar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
sentir/VtVbVfViVjVkVnVrVt
soldar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
sonar/VtSmYsVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
soterrar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
tataramellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
tonar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
trasegar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
trescocer/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
tresvertir/VtVbVfViVjVkVmVrVt
unviar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
verrolar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
volver/VtVbVfVhVjVkVm
zarzamellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
